ru: Разновидность фруктовой смеси: Яблочный микс; Ягодный микс; Цитрусовый микс; Микс экзотических фруктов; Виноградный микс; Дынное ассорти; Смесь для смузи; Микс косточковых фруктов; Тропический микс; Другое
de: Sorte der Fruchtmischung: Apfelmischung; Beerenmischung; Zitrusmischung; Exotische Früchtemischung; Traubenmischung; Melonenmischung; Smoothie-Mischung; Steinobstmischung; Tropische Mischung; Sonstige
th: ผลไม้รวมนานาชนิด: คอมโบแอปเปิล; เบอร์รีรวม; ซิตรัสรวม; ผลไม้แปลกใหม่รวม; องุ่นรวม; เมลอนรวม; สมูทตี้รวม; ผลไม้เมล็ดแข็งรวม; ทรอปิคอลรวม; อื่นๆ
it: Varietà di mix di frutta: Misto mele; Misto frutti di bosco; Misto agrumi; Misto frutta esotica; Misto uva; Misto melone; Misto per frullati; Misto drupacee; Misto tropicale; Altro
sk-SK: Typ ovocnej zmesi: Jablková zmes; Zmes bobuľového ovocia; Zmes citrusov; Zmes exotického ovocia; Hroznová zmes; Zmes melónov; Zmes na smoothie; Zmes kôstkového ovocia; Tropická zmes; Iné
fi: Hedelmäsekoitus: Omenasekoitus; Marjasekoitus; Sitrussekoitus; Eksoottinen hedelmäsekoitus; Rypälesekoitus; Melonisekoitus; Smoothiesekoitus; Luumarjasekoitus; Trooppinen sekoitus; Muu
pt-BR: Variedade da mistura de frutas: Combinação de maçã; Mix de frutas vermelhas; Mix de frutas cítricas; Mix de frutas exóticas; Mix de uvas; Mix de melões; Mix para smoothie; Mix de frutas com caroço; Mix tropical; Outro
pl: Mieszanka owoców: Mieszanka jabłkowa; Mieszanka jagodowa; Mieszanka cytrusowa; Mieszanka owoców egzotycznych; Mieszanka winogronowa; Mieszanka melonowa; Mieszanka do smoothie; Mieszanka owoców pestkowych; Mieszanka tropikalna; Inna
cs: Druh ovocné směsi: Jablečná směs; Bobulová směs; Citrusová směs; Směs exotického ovoce; Hroznová směs; Melounová směs; Směs na smoothie; Směs peckovin; Tropická směs; Ostatní
fr: Variété du mélange de fruits: Assortiment de pommes; Mélange de baies; Mélange d’agrumes; Mélange de fruits exotiques; Mélange de raisins; Mélange de melons; Mélange pour smoothie; Mélange de fruits à noyau; Mélange tropical; Autre
zh-TW: 綜合水果種類: 蘋果綜合; 莓果綜合; 柑橘綜合; 異國水果綜合; 葡萄綜合; 瓜果綜合; 果昔綜合; 核果綜合; 熱帶綜合; 其他
hr-HR: Raznovrsna mješavina voća: Kombinacija jabuka; Mješavina bobičastog voća; Mješavina citrusa; Mješavina egzotičnog voća; Mješavina grožđa; Mješavina dinja/lubenica; Mješavina za smoothie; Mješavina koštuničavog voća; Tropska mješavina; Ostalo
da: Type af frugtblanding: Æbleblanding; Bærblanding; Citrusblanding; Eksotisk frugtblanding; Drueblanding; Melonblanding; Smoothieblanding; Stenfrugtblanding; Tropisk blanding; Andet
el: Ποικιλία μεικτών φρούτων: Συνδυασμός μήλων; Μείγμα μούρων; Μείγμα εσπεριδοειδών; Μείγμα εξωτικών φρούτων; Μείγμα σταφυλιών; Μείγμα πεπονιού; Μείγμα για smoothie; Μείγμα πυρηνόκαρπων; Τροπικό μείγμα; Άλλο
hu: Gyümölcskeverék fajta: Alma mix; Bogyós gyümölcs mix; Citrus mix; Egzotikus gyümölcs mix; Szőlő mix; Dinnye mix; Smoothie mix; Csonthéjas gyümölcs mix; Trópusi mix; Egyéb
zh-CN: 水果混合品种: 混合苹果; 混合浆果; 混合柑橘; 异国水果什锦; 混合葡萄; 混合瓜果; 冰沙混合包; 混合核果; 热带混合水果; 其他
es: Variedad de mezcla de frutas: Combinación de manzanas; Mezcla de bayas; Mezcla de cítricos; Mezcla de frutas exóticas; Mezcla de uvas; Mezcla de melones; Mezcla para batidos; Mezcla de frutas de hueso; Mezcla tropical; Otro
en: Fruit mix variety: Apple combo; Berry blend; Citrus blend; Exotic fruit mix; Grape mix; Melon medley; Smoothie blend; Stone fruit mix; Tropical blend; Other
sl-SI: Raznolikost sadnih mešanic: Jabolčna mešanica; Mešanica jagodičevja; Mešanica citrusov; Mešanica eksotičnega sadja; Mešanica grozdja; Mešanica melon; Mešanica za smuti; Mešanica koščičastega sadja; Tropska mešanica; Drugo
ja: フルーツミックスの種類: アップルコンボ; ベリーブレンド; シトラスブレンド; エキゾチックフルーツミックス; グレープミックス; メロンメドレー; スムージーブレンド; ストーンフルーツミックス; トロピカルブレンド; その他
lt-LT: Vaisių mišinio rūšis: Obuolių mišinys; Uogų mišinys; Citrusinių vaisių mišinys; Egzotinių vaisių mišinys; Vynuogių mišinys; Melionų mišinys; Glotnučių mišinys; Kaulavaisių mišinys; Atogrąžų vaisių mišinys; Kita
nb: Fruktblanding: Epleblanding; Bærblanding; Sitrusblanding; Eksotisk fruktblanding; Drueblanding; Melonblanding; Smoothieblanding; Steinfruktblanding; Tropisk blanding; Annet
ko: 과일 믹스 종류: 사과 콤보; 베리 블렌드; 시트러스 블렌드; 이색 과일 믹스; 포도 믹스; 멜론 메들리; 스무디 블렌드; 핵과 믹스; 트로피컬 블렌드; 기타
nl: Fruitmix variëteit: Appelmix; Bessenmix; Citrusmix; Exotische fruitmix; Druivenmix; Meloenmix; Smoothiemix; Steenfruitmix; Tropische mix; Anders
bg-BG: Разнообразие от плодови миксове: Ябълков микс; Горски плодове; Цитрусов микс; Екзотичен плодов микс; Микс от грозде; Пъпешов микс; Смути микс; Микс от костилкови плодове; Тропически микс; Друго
ro-RO: Varietate de mixuri de fructe: Combinație de mere; Amestec de fructe de pădure; Amestec de citrice; Mix de fructe exotice; Mix de struguri; Amestec de pepeni; Amestec pentru smoothie; Mix de fructe cu sâmbure tare; Amestec tropical; Altele
vi: Loại hỗn hợp trái cây: Táo hỗn hợp; Trái mọng hỗn hợp; Cam quýt hỗn hợp; Trái cây nhiệt đới hỗn hợp; Nho hỗn hợp; Dưa hỗn hợp; Sinh tố hỗn hợp; Trái cây có hạt hỗn hợp; Trái cây nhiệt đới hỗn hợp; Khác
sv: Fruktblandning: Äppelblandning; Bärblandning; Citrusblandning; Exotisk fruktblandning; Druvblandning; Melonblandning; Smoothieblandning; Stenfruktblandning; Tropisk blandning; Övrigt
pt-PT: Variedade de mistura de frutas: Combinação de maçãs; Mistura de frutos vermelhos; Mistura de citrinos; Mistura de frutos exóticos; Mistura de uvas; Mistura de melões; Mistura para smoothie; Mistura de frutos de caroço; Mistura tropical; Outro
tr: Meyve karışımı çeşidi: Elma karışımı; Orman meyvesi karışımı; Turunçgil karışımı; Egzotik meyve karışımı; Üzüm karışımı; Kavun-karpuz karışımı; Smoothie karışımı; Çekirdekli meyve karışımı; Tropikal karışım; Diğer